District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-302.04

Regulatory powers of Mayor.

Repealed.

History

Feb. 21, 1986, D.C. Law 6-85, § 204, 32 DCR 7396
Apr. 12, 1997, D.C. Law 11-259, § 101(i), 44 DCR 1423
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-371, § 1201(a), 58 DCR 1185

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1182.4.

Delegation of Authority

Delegation of Authority Under D.C. Law 6-85, the “D.C. Procurement Practices Act of 1985”, see Mayor’s Order 2002-117, July 19, 2002 ( 49 DCR 6880).
Delegation of Authority Under D.C. Law 6-85, the “D.C. Procurement Practices Act of 1985”, see Mayor’s Order 2002-207, December 27, 2002 ( 49 DCR 11867).